Nevada, session 83, AB446.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 705 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 1.3. As used in sections 1.3 to 6, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 1.5 and 1.7 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 1.5. “Class I railroad” has the meaning ascribed to it in
40 C.F.R. § 1033.901.
Sec. 1.7. “Class II railroad” has the meaning ascribed to it
in 40 C.F.R. § 1033.901.
-
*AB446_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 2. 1. A Class I or Class II railroad operating within
this State shall not operate, run or permit to be run anywhere over
a main line or branch line in this State any freight or work train
that is more than 7,500 feet long. Each train operating or running
in violation of this section constitutes a separate violation.
2. A Class I or Class II railroad operating within this State
shall install and maintain a hot box detector not less than every 20
miles along each main line in this State that is owned or operated
by the railroad. A railroad that is required to install a hot box
detector pursuant to this section shall inspect each such hot box
detector installed by the railroad for defects not less than once
every 30 days.
3. Except for a train, rolling stock or other on-track
equipment that is stopped due to mechanical failure where
separation or movement is not possible, a Class I or Class II
railroad operating within this State shall, upon the approach of an
authorized emergency vehicle, cut, separate or cause to be moved
any train, rolling stock or other on-track equipment that has come
to a complete stop and is blocking a railroad grade crossing.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Authorized emergency vehicle” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 484A.020.
(b) “Branch line” means a secondary railroad track that
branches off from a main line.
(c) “Hot box detector” means a device that utilizes infrared
technology to measure the temperature of axles, bearings and the
related equipment of a passing train, rolling stock or other on-
track equipment in order to detect potential defects or abnormal
temperatures of the measured equipment.
(d) “Main line” means:
(1) A segment or route of railroad tracks over which
5,000,000 gross tons or more of freight railroad traffic is
transported annually; and
(2) Such other tracks as the Public Utilities Commission of
Nevada may prescribe by regulation.
(e) “Railroad grade crossing” means any intersection between
a highway, as defined in NRS 706.081, and a railroad track.
Sec. 3. 1. A Class I or Class II railroad operating within
this State shall not knowingly cause to be placed or permit to
remain in the safe space of a railroad track any material or
condition likely to endanger the safety of an employee, including,
without limitation:
(a) Scrap iron;
(b) Lumber;
(c) Debris;
-
*AB446_R1*

– 5 –
(d) Vegetation exceeding a height of 4 inches; or
(e) Marked unevenness of terrain.
2. As used in this section, “safe space” means the area whose
dimensions include the entire length of any railroad track and:
(a) A height from actual grade level to 14 feet above the top of
the rails of the track; and
(b) A width extending 8 feet perpendicularly, on both sides,
from the center line of the track.
Sec. 4. 1. A Class I or Class II railroad that operates a
railroad yard in this State where rail cars or locomotives are
frequently switched, repaired or inspected at night or where trains
are frequently assembled or disassembled at night shall submit to
the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada, not later than
January 15 of each year, a report that:
(a) Identifies each such railroad yard.
(b) For each railroad yard identified pursuant to
paragraph (a):
(1) Describes the nature and placement of lighting
equipment currently in use at the railroad yard; and
(2) Describes the practices of the railroad relating to
maintenance and operation of the lighting equipment described in
subparagraph (1).
(c) States for each railroad yard identified pursuant to
paragraph (a) whether the lighting equipment in the railroad yard
meets or exceeds the guidelines for illumination established by the
American Railway Engineering and Maintenance-of-Way
Association.
(d) States for each railroad yard identified pursuant to
paragraph (a) whether the lighting equipment in the railroad yard
is installed and operated in a manner consistent with:
(1) Conserving energy;
(2) Reducing glare;
(3) Minimizing light pollution; and
(4) Preserving the natural environment of the night.
(e) Contains either:
(1) A plan developed by the railroad for bringing into
compliance any railroad yard identified by the railroad pursuant
to paragraph (a) in which the lighting equipment:
(I) Does not meet or exceed the guidelines described in
paragraph (c); or
(II) Is not operated in accordance with the objectives
described in paragraph (d);
(2) A declaration that the lighting equipment in each
railroad yard operated by the railroad meets or exceeds the
-
*AB446_R1*

– 6 –
guidelines described in paragraph (c) and is operated in
accordance with the objectives described in paragraph (d); or
(3) An explanation of why the guidelines and objectives
described in paragraphs (c) and (d), respectively, should not apply
to a railroad yard operated by the railroad, based on
circumstances individually applicable to each applicable railroad
yard.
2. A railroad that is required to submit a report pursuant to
subsection 1 shall maintain all lighting equipment at each railroad
yard operated by the railroad in good and working order.
3. If a railroad that is required to submit a report pursuant to
subsection 1 receives a report from any person that any lighting
equipment at a railroad yard is malfunctioning, the railroad shall
repair or replace the malfunctioning equipment within 48 hours
after receiving the report.
4. If any employees of a railroad yard operated by a railroad
that is required to submit a report pursuant to subsection 1 have
elected to be represented by a labor union, the representative of
each union for the employees of each applicable railroad yard
shall submit to the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada, not
later than January 15 of each year, a report that:
(a) Describes the nature and placement of lighting equipment
currently in use at the railroad yard and the maintenance status
and operation of the lighting equipment;
(b) Describes the level of maintenance of the lighting
equipment and the promptness of the railroad in responding to
reports of malfunctions of the lighting equipment;
(c) States whether the available lighting at the railroad yard is
adequate to provide adequate working conditions for employees
working at night; and
(d) Describes any applicable changes in the lighting equipment
and any observed changes in the maintenance and operation
practices relating to the equipment that have occurred since the
last time a report was submitted for a railroad yard pursuant to
this section.
5. A Class I or Class II railroad that operates a railroad yard
in this State where rail cars or locomotives that carry placarded
hazardous materials are frequently switched, repaired or inspected
at night or where trains with more than 25 tanker rail cars
carrying placarded hazardous materials are frequently assembled
or disassembled at night shall install and operate lighting
equipment in each such railroad yard:
(a) That meets or exceeds the guidelines for illumination
established by the American Railway Engineering and
Maintenance-of-Way Association; and
-
*AB446_R1*

– 7 –
(b) In a manner consistent with:
(1) Conserving energy;
(2) Reducing glare;
(3) Minimizing light pollution; and
(4) Preserving the natural environment of the night.
6. The Public Utilities Commission of Nevada shall:
(a) Review all reports submitted pursuant to subsections 1 and
4 and investigate any discrepancies between a report submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 and subsection 4 with respect to a
particular railroad yard.
(b) Upon the conclusion of an investigation undertaken
pursuant to paragraph (a), report the findings of the investigation
to the railroad that operates the applicable railroad yard and the
union representative for the employees of the railroad yard.
(c) On or before December 31 of each year, compile a report
that contains:
(1) A summary of the reports received pursuant to this
section during the immediately preceding year;
(2) The results of any investigation undertaken pursuant to
paragraph (a) during the immediately preceding year;
(3) A summary of the progress achieved by railroads in this
State with achieving the guidelines and objectives for lighting
equipment in railroad yards described in paragraphs (c) and (d),
respectively, of subsection 1; and
(4) Recommendations for legislation to improve safety in
and around railroad yards at night, including, without limitation,
additional standards and guidelines for lighting equipment
installed in railroad yards.
(d) Transmit the report compiled pursuant to paragraph (c) to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal:
(1) In odd-numbered years, to the next regular session of
the Legislature.
(2) In even-numbered years, to:
(I) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Commerce
and Labor; and
(II) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Growth
and Infrastructure.
7. The Public Utilities Commission of Nevada shall adopt
regulations prescribing what constitutes “frequent” for the
purposes of this section.
Sec. 5. 1. If the employees of a railroad company owning
or operating a railroad in this State, or any particular subset of
employees of the railroad company, have elected to be represented
by a labor union, the railroad company shall authorize the
designated representative of each such union to monitor the safety
-
*AB446_R1*

– 8 –
practices and operations of the railroad. The railroad company
shall authorize each designated representative of the union to:
(a) Carry out physical inspections of railroad property, when
such inspections can be safely conducted;
(b) Take photographs of or on railroad property; and
(c) Conduct such other examinations of railroad property and
interviews of employees of the railroad company who are
represented by the union as may be necessary to:
(1) Ensure the compliance of the railroad with all
applicable state and federal laws and regulations relating to the
safety of employees of the railroad company; and
(2) Investigate a potential safety hazard that may result in
injury or death to an employee of the railroad company
represented by the union.
2. If a train, rail car, locomotive or other equipment owned or
operated by a railroad company, or operating on tracks owned or
operated by the railroad company, is involved in a derailment,
collision, split switch, run-away equipment event, an unintended
separation of equipment event or any other incident occurring
outside of normal railroad operations, the railroad company
owning or operating the applicable train, rail car, locomotive or
other equipment shall:
(a) Report the incident to the Public Utilities Commission of
Nevada within 30 days after the incident, regardless of whether
the incident caused any property damage, and include within the
report a copy of the investigation of the incident conducted by the
railroad company, if applicable.
(b) Immediately report the incident to the designated
representative of the union of each employee involved in the
incident, and the local leader of each such union, as applicable,
and authorize each representative of such a union and its local
leader to conduct an investigation of the incident on behalf of the
union in a manner consistent with subsection 1.
Sec. 6. 1. The Public Utilities Commission of Nevada shall
require each Class I or Class II railroad operating within this
State to provide a bond executed by the company, corporation or
receiver, as applicable, as principal, and by a corporation qualified
pursuant to the laws of this State as a surety, payable to the State
of Nevada, and conditioned upon the faithful performance of all
the requirements of sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act. The total
amount of the bond must be not less than $5,000,000.
2. A Class I or Class II railroad that violates any provision of
sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act, is liable to the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada for a civil penalty of:
-
*AB446_R1*

– 9 –
(a) Not less than $500, but not more than $25,000 for each
violation; or
(b) Not more than $100,000 for each violation, if the Public
Utilities Commission of Nevada first determines, after notice and
an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 703.320, that:
(1) The railroad committed the violation in a grossly
negligent manner; or
(2) The violation is a part of a pattern of repeated
violations.
Sec. 7. Chapter 706 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 8. As used in sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act, the
words and terms defined in sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 9. “Drive time” means the length of time that a
transport vehicle driver spends behind the wheel of a transport
vehicle performing transportation assignments or driving to or
from a transportation assignment.
Sec. 10. “Off-duty time” means a period of time that a
transport vehicle driver is not on-duty, during which time the
railroad contract carrier is unable to communicate with the
transport vehicle driver in a manner that could disrupt the rest of
the transport vehicle driver.
Sec. 11. “On-duty time” means all time from the time a
transport vehicle driver begins to work or is required to be in
readiness to work until the time the transport vehicle driver is
relieved from work and all responsibility for performing work. The
term includes, without limitation:
1. Time spent at the facility of the railroad contract carrier
waiting to be dispatched for a transportation assignment;
2. Time spent inspecting, servicing or maintaining a transport
vehicle;
3. Any time classified as drive time;
4. Any time required to be spent in a transport vehicle other
than drive time;
5. Time spent supervising, assisting or attending the loading
and unloading of passengers of a transport vehicle;
6. Time spent obtaining assistance for or safeguarding a
disabled transport vehicle; and
7. Time spent providing a breath sample or urine sample,
including travel time to and from the testing site, as required to
comply with federal or state law, including the requirements of
section 17 of this act.
-
*AB446_R1*

– 10 –
Sec. 12. “Railroad contract carrier” means a contract motor
carrier engaged in intrastate transportation by transport vehicle of
the employees of a railroad to or from a work assignment for
compensation.
Sec. 13. “Transport vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
1. Has a seating capacity of 15 passengers or less; and
2. Is used by a railroad contract carrier to transport
employees of a railroad to or from a work assignment.
Sec. 14. “Transport vehicle driver” means a person who is
employed by a railroad contract carrier to drive employees of a
railroad to or from a work assignment using a transport vehicle.
Sec. 15. 1. A railroad contract carrier shall not allow or
require a transport vehicle driver to accrue:
(a) Within any 24-hour period:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, more than
10 hours of drive time following 8 consecutive hours of off-duty
time.
(2) More than 15 hours of on-duty time since the transport
vehicle driver last had 8 consecutive hours of off-duty time.
(b) More than 70 hours of total on-duty time in any period of 7
consecutive days.
2. A railroad contract carrier may authorize a transport
vehicle driver to accrue an additional 2 hours of drive time, in
addition to the limit established pursuant to subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, if:
(a) The driver encounters an emergency during a
transportation assignment and, because of the emergency, cannot
safely complete the assignment within the 10 hours of drive time
allowed pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1;
(b) The transportation assignment could have otherwise been
completed within the drive time remaining for the driver in the 24-
hour period, absent the emergency; and
(c) The additional drive time is used by the transport vehicle
driver for the sole purpose of:
(1) Completing the transportation assignment, if the
assignment can be completed within the additional hours of drive
time authorized by this subsection; or
(2) Reaching a place or destination that offers safety for the
occupants of the transport motor vehicle and security for the
transport vehicle.
3. A railroad contract carrier shall require each transport
vehicle driver employed by the carrier to keep and maintain
accurate time records for each day that the transport vehicle driver
-
*AB446_R1*

– 11 –
is on duty. The records kept by each transport vehicle driver must
include, without limitation:
(a) The time that the transport vehicle driver reported for duty
on that day;
(b) The total number of hours of on-duty time worked by the
transport vehicle driver on that day;
(c) The time that the transport vehicle driver was released from
duty on that day; and
(d) The total number of hours that the transport vehicle driver
drove for the railroad contract carrier on that day.
4. A railroad contract carrier shall collect all of the records
required to be kept and maintained by each transport vehicle
driver pursuant to subsection 3 and shall retain each record
collected from each driver for not less than 1 year from the date
on which each record was compiled.
Sec. 16. 1. A railroad contract carrier shall not employ any
person as a transport vehicle driver if:
(a) The driving privileges or driver’s license of the person or
driver’s permit issued to the person pursuant to NRS 706.462 has
ever been suspended or revoked by the Department, the Authority,
or any department or regulatory body of any other state or
territory of the United States based on a conviction of any offense
described in paragraph (b).
(b) The person has been found to have committed two or more
of the following offenses within a 3-year period in any state or
territory of the United States:
(1) Any traffic offense relating to intoxication, including,
without limitation, any violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 and
484C.130.
(2) Any traffic offense which specifically applies to
commercial motor vehicles.
(3) Any seat belt violation, including, without limitation, a
violation of NRS 484D.495.
(4) Driving 15 miles per hour or more over the speed limit.
(5) Vehicular manslaughter pursuant to NRS 484B.657, a
violation of subsection 9 of NRS 484B.653 or a similar offense,
the elements of which involve the death of a person caused by the
negligent or grossly negligent operation of a motor vehicle.
(6) Using a vehicle to commit a felony.
(7) Any offense involving the failure to maintain the
requisite minimum amount of insurance or financial
responsibility as required by law or the failure to maintain proof
of such financial responsibility, including, without limitation, a
violation of NRS 485.187.
-
*AB446_R1*

– 12 –
(8) Any offense involving a breach of a duty or
responsibility under law to stop and remain at the scene of a
crash, including, without limitation, a violation of NRS 484E.010,
484E.020 or 484E.030.
(9) Fleeing and attempting to elude law enforcement
through the use of a vehicle, including, without limitation, a
violation of NRS 484B.550.
(10) Reckless or aggressive driving, including, without
limitation, a violation of NRS 484B.650 or 484B.653.
(11) Unlawfully passing a school bus, including, without
limitation, a violation of NRS 484B.353.
(12) Failure to obey an official traffic control device,
including, without limitation, a violation of NRS 484B.300.
(13) Failure to stop at a railroad grade crossing or obey a
traffic-control device for railroad crossings, including, without
limitation, a violation of NRS 484B.553 or 484B.557.
(14) Driving without a valid driver’s license or driving with
a cancelled, suspended or revoked driver’s license, including,
without limitation, a violation of NRS 483.550 or 483.560.
(15) Driving the wrong way down a one-way street or
driving the wrong way on a divided highway, including, without
limitation, a violation of NRS 484B.220 or 484B.227.
2. A railroad contract carrier shall maintain a file of records
for each transport vehicle driver that the railroad contract carrier
employs. The file must include, without limitation:
(a) A copy of a medical examiner’s certificate issued to the
driver within the last 2 years by a medical examiner licensed in
this State which states that the driver meets the health
requirements established by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Regulations, 49 C.F.R. §§ 391.41 et seq.
(b) Documentation that confirms that the railroad contract
carrier has obtained a copy of the driving record of the transport
vehicle driver at least once each year that the transport vehicle
driver is employed by the railroad contract carrier.
(c) Documents and records relating to the driving record and
history of the transport vehicle driver, including, without
limitation, records of any citations issued to the driver or
convictions of the driver for a violation of the motor vehicle laws
or ordinances of any jurisdiction.
(d) Documents not described in paragraph (b) or (c) that
otherwise relate to the qualification or ability of the transport
vehicle driver to drive a motor vehicle, including, without
limitation, records of any complaints made against the transport
vehicle driver through a hotline maintained by the railroad
-
*AB446_R1*

– 13 –
contract carrier to receive feedback on the driving of transport
vehicle drivers.
(e) The application for employment submitted by the transport
vehicle driver, which must conform with the requirements of 49
C.F.R. § 391.21(b).
(f) Responses or documentation received by the railroad
contract carrier from the previous employer of the transport
vehicle driver relating to the safety record of the transport vehicle
driver.
3. As used in this section, “medical examiner” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8842.
Sec. 17. 1. A railroad contract carrier shall not permit a
person to perform the duties of a transport vehicle driver unless
the person has undergone testing for alcohol or controlled
substances in a manner consistent with the provisions of 49 C.F.R.
Parts 40 and 382. A person may perform the duties of a transport
vehicle driver if the testing of the person indicates:
(a) A blood alcohol concentration of zero; and
(b) A negative test result for the presence of controlled
substances.
2. A railroad contract carrier shall not permit a person to
perform, and a person shall not perform, the duties of a transport
vehicle driver if:
(a) The results of the testing of the person for alcohol and
controlled substances are not in compliance with subsection 1;
(b) The person refuses to agree to testing or refuses to submit a
specimen for an alcohol test or controlled substances test; or
(c) The person submits an adulterated specimen, a dilute
positive specimen or a substituted specimen for an alcohol test or a
controlled substances test.
3. As soon as practicable after an accident occurs, during a
transportation assignment, involving a motor vehicle owned or
operated by a railroad contract carrier, the railroad contract
carrier shall test each surviving transport vehicle driver for
alcohol or controlled substances, in a manner consistent with the
provisions of 49 C.F.R. Parts 40 and 382, if:
(a) The accident involved the loss of human life.
(b) The transport vehicle driver received a moving violation
citation or civil infraction citation arising from or relating to the
accident and the accident additionally resulted in:
(1) Bodily injury to a person who received medical attention
for that injury at the scene of the accident or immediately after
leaving the scene of the accident; or
-
*AB446_R1*

– 14 –
(2) One or more vehicles involved in the accident being
rendered disabled or immovable due to damages sustained in the
accident.
4. If the railroad contract carrier is unable to conduct the
testing required pursuant to subsection 3 immediately following
the accident, the railroad contract carrier shall conduct the
testing:
(a) For alcohol, within 8 hours after the accident.
(b) For controlled substances, within 32 hours after the
accident.
5. A railroad contract carrier shall transmit to the Authority
the results of any testing required to be conducted pursuant to
subsection 3.
6. A railroad contract carrier shall maintain any record
relating to the testing of a person for alcohol and controlled
substances pursuant to this section for a period of not less than 5
years after the record is compiled or generated. All records that
are required to be maintained by this section must be maintained
in a safe and secure location.
Sec. 18. 1. A railroad contract carrier shall inspect each
transport vehicle, and the components thereof at least once every
12 months in a manner that conforms with the requirements of 49
C.F.R. § 396.17 and Appendix A to that part. Each inspection
conducted pursuant to this subsection must be completed by a
person who is qualified under the provisions of 49 C.F.R. § 396.19
to conduct inspections of vehicles.
2. A railroad contract carrier shall require each transport
vehicle driver to complete a written inspection report on each day
that the transport vehicle driver is on duty, in a manner consistent
with the provisions of 49 C.F.R. § 396.11, before the transport
vehicle driver is released from duty for the day.
3. A railroad contract carrier shall adopt a policy to ensure
the safety and maintenance of transport vehicles and the parts,
accessories and other equipment thereof. The policy must:
(a) Require that all parts and accessories stored in, installed
on or equipped with each transport vehicle be inspected for safety
and proper operation at least once a week;
(b) Ensure that each transport vehicle owned or operated by
the railroad contract carrier is equipped with:
(1) Tires with sufficient tread in accordance with 49 C.F.R.
§ 393.75.
(2) A spare tire that is fully inflated.
(3) A secured location for baggage and personal items,
including proper restraints.
(4) Fully operational seatbelts for all passenger seats.
-
*AB446_R1*

– 15 –
(5) If the transport vehicle is expected to be driven through
inclement weather conditions requiring specialized equipment,
traction devices, studs or chains necessary to drive safely in such
conditions.
(6) A heater in working condition and an air conditioner in
working condition, including properly working fans.
(7) A kit for emergencies that contains, without limitation:
(I) An aerosol can or similar device that is capable of
inflating a tire;
(II) Flares or reflective triangles;
(III) Jumper cables; and
(IV) A readily accessible first aid kit that contains, at a
minimum, the contents and articles described in the most recent
American National Standard (ANSI) Z308.1-1998, entitled
“Minimum Requirements for Workplace First-aid Kits” or, any
successor standard described in 29 C.F.R. § 1910.151 and
Appendix A to that section.
(8) An operable amber light or strobe light that is placed on
the roof of the rear one-third portion of the vehicle and that is
capable of providing adequate light to other motorists if the
vehicle is stalled, slowed or stopped in or otherwise obstructing the
roadway.
(9) A windshield, windshield wipers, tail lamps and a
headlamp that comply with the requirements of NRS 705.380.
(c) Require that each transport vehicle be maintained in a
condition and operated in a manner that is not likely to be
hazardous or cause a mechanical breakdown pursuant to
NRS 706.246.
(d) Provide that the railroad contract carrier will adequately
maintain records for each transport vehicle, including, without
limitation:
(1) Records containing the vehicle identification number,
make, model, year of manufacture and manufacturer of each
transport vehicle;
(2) Records containing the information about the owner of
each transport vehicle, if the railroad contract carrier is not the
owner of the transport vehicle; and
(3) Detailed records evidencing all maintenance, servicing
or repair performed on each transport vehicle, which must include
a description of the specific maintenance, service or repair tasks
performed on the transport vehicle and the date on which the
maintenance, service or repair task was performed.
4. A railroad contract carrier shall ensure that each of its
transport vehicle drivers, officers, agents and employees whose
duties or responsibilities are related to inspecting and maintaining
-
*AB446_R1*

– 16 –
transport vehicles comply with and are knowledgeable of the
policy adopted by the railroad contract carrier pursuant to
subsection 3.
5. A railroad contract carrier shall be deemed to have
committed a violation of this section if the railroad contract
carrier operates a transport vehicle on any public road or highway
in this State that does not comply with the requirements
established pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
6. A railroad contract carrier shall maintain all records
required to be maintained pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection
3 at the principal place of business of the railroad contract carrier
for not less than 1 year after each record is compiled or generated,
unless the record pertains to a transport vehicle that is no longer
in the control of the railroad contract carrier, in which case, the
record must be maintained for not less than 6 months after the
record is compiled or generated.
Sec. 19. A railroad contract carrier shall ensure that, while
the railroad contract carrier operates any transport vehicle within
this State, the railroad contract carrier and driver of each such
transport vehicle is covered by a policy of insurance issued by an
insurance company licensed by the Division of Insurance of the
Department of Business and Industry and approved to do business
in this State that includes:
1. Coverage for the payment of tort liabilities arising from the
maintenance or use of the transport vehicle in the amount of:
(a) Not less than $2,000,000 for bodily injury to or death of
one person in any one crash;
(b) Not less than $5,000,000 for bodily injury to or death of
two or more persons in any one crash, subject to the limit for one
person; and
(c) Not less than $1,000,000 for injury to or destruction of
property of others in any one crash; and
2. Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage in an
amount not less than the limits of coverage for bodily injury
maintained by the railroad contract carrier pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 20. 1. The Authority shall require a railroad contract
carrier to provide a bond executed by the railroad contract carrier
as principal, and by a corporation qualified pursuant to the laws
of this State as a surety, payable to the State of Nevada, and
conditioned upon the faithful performance of all the requirements
of sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act. The total amount of the
bond must be not less than $5,000,000.
2. The Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of
Public Safety, the Authority and any member, officer, employee or
-
*AB446_R1*

– 17 –
other designee of the Authority may, pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 706.171 and NRS 706.172, inspect any document or record
required to be maintained pursuant to sections 8 to 20, inclusive,
of this act, and such records shall be deemed to contain
information relating to a matter of public safety.
3. The provisions of sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act:
(a) Shall be construed to be minimum standards; and
(b) Shall not be construed to supersede or abrogate any law,
rule or regulation that imposes stricter standards or regulations
upon a railroad contract carrier.
Sec. 21. NRS 706.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.011 As used in NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and
sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 706.013 to 706.146,
inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 22. NRS 706.156 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.156 1. All common and contract motor carriers and
brokers are hereby declared to be, to the extent provided in this
chapter:
(a) Affected with a public interest; and
(b) Subject to NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive [.] , and
sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act.
2. A purchaser or broker of transportation services which are
provided by a common motor carrier who holds a certificate of
public convenience and necessity may resell those services, in
combination with other services and facilities that are not related to
transportation, but only in a manner complying with the scope of
authority set forth in the certificate of the common motor carrier.
The Authority shall not prohibit or restrict such a purchaser or
broker from reselling those transportation services to any person
based upon that person’s affiliation, or lack of affiliation, with any
group.
Sec. 23. NRS 706.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.163 The provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive,
and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act do not apply to vehicles
leased to or owned by:
1. The Federal Government or any instrumentality thereof.
2. Any state or a political subdivision thereof.
Sec. 24. NRS 706.281 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.281 1. In addition to any identifying device provided for
in this chapter, each motor vehicle within the provisions of NRS
706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of
this act must have the name of the operator operating the vehicle
displayed on the vehicle in such location, size and style as may be
specified by the Authority. The display shall not be deemed
-
*AB446_R1*

– 18 –
advertising for the purposes of NRS 706.285 unless additional
information about the operator is included.
2. This section does not apply to motor vehicles:
(a) Weighing 10,000 pounds or less operated by private carriers
and not operated in combination with any other vehicle.
(b) Operated by an employer for the transportation of the
employees of that employer, whether or not the employees pay for
the transportation.
Sec. 25. NRS 706.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.291 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 19
of this act, the Authority shall require every fully regulated carrier
and every operator of a tow car, within such time and in such
amounts as the Authority may designate, to file with the Authority
in a form required and approved by the Authority a liability
insurance policy, or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, or a
bond of a surety company, or other surety, in such reasonable sum
as the Authority may deem necessary to protect adequately the
interests of the public.
2. The Department shall require every other common and
contract motor carrier and every private carrier, within such time
and in such amounts as the Department may designate, to file with
the Department in a form required and approved by the Department
a liability insurance policy, or a certificate of insurance in lieu
thereof, a bond of a surety company, or other surety, in such
reasonable sum as the Department may deem necessary to protect
adequately the interests of the public. In determining the amount of
liability insurance or other surety required of a carrier pursuant to
this subsection, the Department shall create a separate category for
vehicles with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of less
than 26,000 pounds and impose a lesser requirement with respect to
such vehicles.
3. The liability insurance policy or certificate, policy or bond
of a surety company or other surety must bind the obligors
thereunder to pay the compensation for injuries to persons or for
loss or damage to property resulting from the negligent operation of
the carrier.
4. The Authority and the Department may jointly prescribe by
regulation the respective amounts and forms required by subsections
1 and 2.
Sec. 26. NRS 706.321 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.321 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
every common or contract motor carrier shall file with the
Authority:
(a) Within a time to be fixed by the Authority, schedules and
tariffs that must:
-
*AB446_R1*

– 19 –
(1) Be open to public inspection; and
(2) Include all rates, fares and charges which the carrier has
established and which are in force at the time of filing for any
service performed in connection therewith by any carrier controlled
and operated by it.
(b) As a part of that schedule, all regulations of the carrier that
in any manner affect the rates or fares charged or to be charged for
any service and all regulations of the carrier that the carrier has
adopted to comply with the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.791,
inclusive [.] , and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act.
2. Every operator of a tow car shall file with the Authority:
(a) Within a time to be fixed by the Authority, schedules and
tariffs that must:
(1) Be open to public inspection; and
(2) Include all rates and charges for towing services
performed without the prior consent of the owner of the vehicle or
the person authorized by the owner to operate the vehicle which the
operator has established and which are in force at the time of filing.
(b) As a part of that schedule, all regulations of the operator of
the tow car which in any manner affect the rates charged or to be
charged for towing services performed without the prior consent of
the owner of the vehicle or the person authorized by the owner to
operate the vehicle and all regulations of the operator of the tow car
that the operator has adopted to comply with the provisions of NRS
706.011 to 706.791, inclusive [.] , and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of
this act.
3. No changes may be made in any schedule, including
schedules of joint rates, or in the regulations affecting any rates or
charges, except upon 30 days’ notice to the Authority, and all those
changes must be plainly indicated on any new schedules filed in lieu
thereof 30 days before the time they are to take effect. The
Authority, upon application of any carrier, may prescribe a shorter
time within which changes may be made. The 30 days’ notice is not
applicable when the carrier gives written notice to the Authority 10
days before the effective date of its participation in a tariff bureau’s
rates and tariffs, provided the rates and tariffs have been previously
filed with and approved by the Authority.
4. The Authority may at any time, upon its own motion,
investigate any of the rates, fares, charges, regulations, practices and
services filed pursuant to this section and, after hearing, by order,
make such changes as may be just and reasonable.
5. The Authority may dispense with the hearing on any change
requested in rates, fares, charges, regulations, practices or service
filed pursuant to this section.
-
*AB446_R1*

– 20 –
6. All rates, fares, charges, classifications and joint rates,
regulations, practices and services fixed by the Authority are in
force, and are prima facie lawful, from the date of the order until
changed or modified by the Authority.
7. All regulations, practices and service prescribed by the
Authority must be enforced and are prima facie reasonable unless
suspended or found otherwise in an action brought for the purpose,
or until changed or modified by the Authority itself upon
satisfactory showing made.
Sec. 27. NRS 706.431 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.431 1. A permit may be issued to any applicant therefor,
authorizing in whole or in part the operation covered by the
application, if it appears from the application or from any hearing
held thereon that:
(a) The applicant is fit, willing and able properly to perform the
service of a contract motor carrier and to conform to all provisions
of NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and sections 8 to 20,
inclusive, of this act and the regulations adopted thereunder; and
(b) The proposed operation will be consistent with the public
interest and will not operate to defeat the legislative policy set forth
in NRS 706.151.
2. If the Authority proceeds with a hearing on an application
for a permit, the Authority shall fix a time and place for the hearing.
3. The Authority may dispense with the hearing, if any, on the
application if, upon the expiration of the time fixed in the notice
thereof, no petition to intervene has been filed on behalf of any
person who has filed a protest against the granting of the permit.
4. An application must be denied if the provisions of
subsection 1 are not met.
5. The Authority shall revoke or suspend pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter the permit of a contract motor carrier who
has failed to file the annual report required in NRS 706.167 within
60 days after the report is due.
6. The Authority shall adopt regulations providing for a
procedure by which any contract entered into by a contract motor
carrier after the contract motor carrier has been issued a permit
pursuant to this section may be approved by the Authority without
giving notice required by statute or by a regulation of the Authority.
Sec. 28. NRS 706.461 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.461 When:
1. A complaint has been filed with the Authority alleging that
any vehicle is being operated without a certificate of public
convenience and necessity or contract carrier’s permit as required by
NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive [;] , and sections 8 to 20,
inclusive, of this act; or
-
*AB446_R1*

– 21 –
2. The Authority has reason to believe that any:
(a) Person is advertising to provide:
(1) The services of a fully regulated carrier in intrastate
commerce; or
(2) Towing services,
 without including the number of the person’s certificate of public
convenience and necessity or permit in each advertisement; or
(b) Provision of NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and
sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act is being violated,
 the Authority shall investigate the operations or advertising and
may, after a hearing, order the owner or operator of the vehicle or
the person advertising to cease and desist from any operation or
advertising in violation of NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive [.] ,
and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act. The Authority shall
enforce compliance with the order pursuant to the powers vested in
the Authority by NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and sections 8
to 20, inclusive, of this act or by other law.
Sec. 29. NRS 706.756 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.756 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
person who:
(a) Operates a vehicle or causes it to be operated in any carriage
to which the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and
sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act apply without first obtaining a
certificate, permit or license, or in violation of the terms thereof;
(b) Fails to make any return or report required by the provisions
of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and sections 8 to 20,
inclusive, of this act or by the Authority or the Department pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive [;] , and
sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act;
(c) Violates, or procures, aids or abets the violating of, any
provision of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive [;] , and sections 8
to 20, inclusive, of this act;
(d) Fails to obey any order, decision or regulation of the
Authority or the Department;
(e) Procures, aids or abets any person in the failure to obey such
an order, decision or regulation of the Authority or the Department;
(f) Advertises, solicits, proffers bids or otherwise is held out to
perform transportation as a common or contract carrier in violation
of any of the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive [;] ,
and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act;
(g) Advertises as providing:
(1) The services of a fully regulated carrier; or
(2) Towing services,
-
*AB446_R1*

– 22 –
 without including the number of the person’s certificate of public
convenience and necessity or contract carrier’s permit in each
advertisement;
(h) Knowingly offers, gives, solicits or accepts any rebate,
concession or discrimination in violation of the provisions of this
chapter;
(i) Knowingly, willfully and fraudulently seeks to evade or
defeat the purposes of this chapter;
(j) Operates or causes to be operated a vehicle which does not
have the proper identifying device;
(k) Displays or causes or permits to be displayed a certificate,
permit, license or identifying device, knowing it to be fictitious or to
have been cancelled, revoked, suspended or altered;
(l) Lends or knowingly permits the use of by one not entitled
thereto any certificate, permit, license or identifying device issued to
the person so lending or permitting the use thereof; or
(m) Refuses or fails to surrender to the Authority or Department
any certificate, permit, license or identifying device which has been
suspended, cancelled or revoked pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be
punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000, or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 6 months, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
2. Any person who, in violation of the provisions of NRS
706.386, operates as a fully regulated common motor carrier without
first obtaining a certificate of public convenience and necessity or
any person who, in violation of the provisions of NRS 706.421,
operates as a contract motor carrier without first obtaining a permit
is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished:
(a) For a first offense within a period of 12 consecutive months,
by a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $1,000. In addition to
the fine, the person may be punished by imprisonment in the county
jail for not more than 6 months.
(b) For a second offense within a period of 12 consecutive
months and for each subsequent offense that is committed within a
period of 12 consecutive months of any prior offense under this
subsection, by a fine of $1,000. In addition to the fine, the person
may be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more
than 6 months.
3. Any person who, in violation of the provisions of NRS
706.386, operates or permits the operation of a vehicle in passenger
service without first obtaining a certificate of public convenience
and necessity is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
-
*AB446_R1*

– 23 –
4. If a law enforcement officer witnesses a violation of any
provision of subsection 2 or 3, the law enforcement officer may
cause the vehicle to be towed immediately from the scene and
impounded in accordance with NRS 706.476.
5. The fines provided in this section are mandatory and must
not be reduced under any circumstances by the court.
6. Any bail allowed must not be less than the appropriate fine
provided for by this section.
Sec. 30. NRS 706.781 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.781 In addition to all the other remedies provided by NRS
706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of
this act for the prevention and punishment of any violation of the
provisions thereof and of all orders of the Authority or the
Department, the Authority or the Department may compel
compliance with the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861,
inclusive, and sections 8 to 20, inclusive, of this act and with the
orders of the Authority or the Department by proceedings in
mandamus, injunction or by other civil remedies.
Sec. 31. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 32. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 31, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB446_R1*